District of Columbia statutes.
21-108

Selection of guardian by infant.

(a)

When a guardian, either of the person or the estate, of an infant is appointed, the infant shall, if practicable, be brought before the court, and, if over 14 years of age, shall be entitled to select and nominate his or her guardian.

(b)

When a guardian has been appointed before the infant has attained the age of 14 years, the infant, upon arriving at that age, may select a new guardian, notwithstanding the appointment before made.

(c)

The court shall pass upon the character and competency of the guardian selected by the infant, and the guardian shall be:

(1)

required to give bond as in other cases;

(2)

subject to the control of the court; and

(3)

under the same obligations and discharge the same duties — as if selected by the court.

(d)

When, after a guardian of the estate has been appointed, the infant selects a new guardian upon arriving at the age of 14 years, and the new selection is approved by the court, and the person selected is duly appointed and qualified, the guardian previously appointed shall settle his final account and turn over his ward’s estate to the newly appointed guardian.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 21-107.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-108.
1973 Ed., § 21-108.